Illinois, session 104th, SB3403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 4-110 and 22A-115 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-110)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-110)7    Sec. 4-110. Disability pension; line pension - Line of 8duty. If a firefighter, as the result of sickness, accident or 9injury incurred in or resulting from the performance of an act 10of duty or from the cumulative effects of acts of duty, is 11found, pursuant to Section 4-112, to be physically or mentally 12permanently disabled for service in the fire department, so as 13to render necessary his or her being placed on disability 14pension, the firefighter shall be entitled to a disability 15pension equal to the greater of (1) 65% of the monthly salary 16attached to the rank held by him or her in the fire department 17at the date he or she is removed from the municipality's fire 18department payroll or (2) the retirement pension that the 19firefighter would be eligible to receive if he or she retired 20(but not including any automatic annual increase in that 21retirement pension). A firefighter shall be considered "on 22duty" while on any assignment approved by the chief of the fire 23department, even though away from the municipality he or she   SB3403 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19237 RPS 32683 b1serves as a firefighter, if the assignment is related to the 2fire protection service of the municipality.3    Such firefighter shall also be entitled to a child's 4disability benefit of $20 a month on account of each unmarried 5child less than 18 years of age and dependent upon the 6firefighter for support, either the issue of the firefighter 7or legally adopted by him or her. The total amount of child's 8disability benefit payable to the firefighter, when added to 9his or her disability pension, shall not exceed 75% of the 10amount of salary which the firefighter was receiving at the 11date of retirement.12    Benefits payable on account of a child under this Section 13shall not be reduced or terminated by reason of the child's 14attainment of age 18 if he or she is then dependent by reason 15of a physical or mental disability but shall continue to be 16paid as long as such dependency continues. Individuals over 17the age of 18 and adjudged to be disabled persons pursuant to 18Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975, except for persons 19receiving benefits under Article III of the Illinois Public 20Aid Code, shall be eligible to receive benefits under this 21Act.22    If a firefighter dies while still disabled and receiving a 23disability pension under this Section, the disability pension 24shall continue to be paid to the firefighter's survivors in 25the sequence provided in Section 4-114.26    The disability pension under this Section that continues   SB3403 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19237 RPS 32683 b1to be paid to the firefighter's survivors shall be increased 2to $50,051.76 and adjusted by a simple 3% increase annually 3from the initial adjustment if all of the following conditions 4are met: 5        (1) the firefighter died in 2023;6        (2) the firefighter died less than 6 months before his 7    or her 60th birthday; and8        (3) by no later than one year after the effective date 9    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 10    board of trustees of the fire protection district adopted 11    an ordinance or resolution granting the increase.12    A pension previously granted under Section 4-114 to a 13survivor of a firefighter who died while receiving a 14disability pension under this Section shall be deemed to be a 15continuation of the pension provided under this Section and 16shall be deemed to be in the nature of worker's compensation 17payments. The changes to this Section made by this amendatory 18Act of 1995 are intended to be retroactive and are not limited 19to persons in service on or after its effective date.20(Source: P.A. 93-1090, eff. 3-11-05.) 21    (40 ILCS 5/22A-115)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 22A-115)22    Sec. 22A-115. Audits and reports. At least annually, the 23books, records, accounts and securities of the board shall be 24audited by a certified public accountant designated by the 25Auditor General of the State. The audit opinion shall be   SB3403 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19237 RPS 32683 b1published as a part of the annual report of the board.2    For the quarterly periods ending September 30, December 331, and March 31, the board shall submit to each pension fund, 4retirement system or education fund under its jurisdiction a 5report embracing, among other things, the following 6information: (a) a full description of the investments 7acquired, showing average costs; (b) a full description of the 8securities sold or exchanged, showing average proceeds or 9other conditions of an exchange; (c) gains or losses realized 10during the period; (d) income from investments; (e) 11administrative expenses of the board; and (f) the proportion 12of administrative expenses allocable to each pension fund, 13retirement system or education fund.14    An annual report shall be prepared by the board for 15submission to each pension fund, retirement system or 16education fund under its jurisdiction within 6 months after 17the close of each fiscal year, except that the board shall not 18be considered in violation of this provision if the board has 19not received the audit opinion required pursuant to this 20Section by December 15. A fiscal year shall date from July 1 of 21one year to June 30 of the year next following. This report 22shall embody full information concerning the results of 23investment operations of the board for the year, including the 24foregoing information and, in addition thereto, the following:25    (a) a listing of the investments held by the board as at 26the end of the year showing their book values and market values   SB3403 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19237 RPS 32683 b1and their income yields on market values;2    (b) the amounts as determined under paragraph (a) above 3allocable to each pension fund or education fund managed by 4the board;5    (c) comments on the pertinent factors affecting the 6operations of the board for the year;7    (d) a review of the policies maintained by the board and 8any changes therein that occurred during the year;9    (e) a copy of the audited financial statements for the 10year;11    (f) recommendations for possible changes in the law 12governing the operations of the board; and13    (g) a listing of the names of securities brokers and 14dealers dealt with during the year showing the total amount of 15commissions received by each on transactions with the board.16(Source: P.A. 84-1127.) 17    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 18Section 8.50 as follows: 19    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)20    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 218 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 22the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 23Act of the 104th General Assembly. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3403 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19237 RPS 32683 b1becoming law.